Idaho, session 2025, S1177.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Occupational and Pro-
fessional Licenses the following amounts to be expended according to the
designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. BUILDING CONSTRUCTION AND REAL ESTATE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $188,300 $91,600 $824,500 $1,104,400
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Industrial Safety
Fund 25,200 25,200
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Logging
Fund 8,500 0 0 8,500
TOTAL $222,000 $91,600 $824,500 $1,138,100
II. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $15,600 $76,000 $91,600
III. HEALTH PROFESSIONS:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $39,200 $39,200


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
GRAND TOTAL $222,000 $146,400 $900,500 $1,268,900
SECTION 2. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES FEE AND FUND REPORTS. The Division
of Occupational and Professional Licenses shall prepare quarterly reports
regarding the revenues and expenditures of each board and commission. Such
reports shall be submitted within fifteen business days after the end of
each quarter to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office, and a copy of each report pertaining to a certain board or
commission shall be submitted to that board or commission. The Division
of Occupational and Professional Licenses shall prepare a year-end report
regarding the cash balances of each board and commission. The format of the
report and information contained therein shall be determined by the Leg-
islative Services Office Legislative Audits and Budget and Policy Analysis
Divisions no later than August 1, 2025. The report shall be submitted to the
Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no
later than December 1, 2025. If the year-end cash balance of any board or
commission fund detail exceeds one hundred fifty percent of the five year
rolling average of expenditures, the Division of Occupational and Profes-
sional Licenses shall present a plan in the annual report to the Legislature
for reducing fund balances, including but not limited to fee reductions and
holidays. If the year-end cash balance of any fund detail drops below thirty
percent of the five year rolling average of expenditures, the Division of Oc-
cupational and Professional Licenses shall present a plan to the Legislature
for rectifying the low fund balance.
SECTION 3. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.